Massachusetts, session 194th, S2536.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 39 the following section:-
Section 39A. (a) All public institutions of higher education, as set forth in section 5, shall
develop and adopt written policies and procedures to accept a score of 3, 4 and 5 on all advanced
placement examinations to satisfy degree requirements. The policies shall indicate whether the
credit shall be granted for general education, major or elective requirements at the institution,
and shall include procedures related to the transferability of these credits to another institution of
higher education. An institution may not require an exam score of more than 3 unless the chief
academic officer provides evidence that the higher score is necessary for a student to be
successful in a related or more advanced course for which the lower-division course is a
prerequisite. The department may permit said evidence to remain valid across successive
academic years, provided that the institution’s course content, policies and procedures governing
the award of credit and the relevant advanced placement course’s content remain substantially
unchanged. The department of higher education shall develop and provide guidance on what
of 3

constitutes evidence for an institution to require an examination score of more than 3 and a
standard form for submitting said evidence, provided that guidance relating to the University of
Massachusetts shall be developed in coordination with the board of trustees of the University of
Massachusetts.
(b) All policies and procedures governing the award of credit shall be posted on the
institution’s website under the category of admission, which the institution shall update as
necessary to reflect any changes in policies and procedures. In addition, each institution shall
submit its policies and procedures, or any changes thereto, to the department of higher education
who shall post each institution’s policies and procedures, or changes thereto, on the department’s
website.
(c) The board of higher education, and in the case of the University of Massachusetts, in
cooperation with the board of trustees of the University of Massachusetts, shall annually review
the advanced placement examination score course granting policies of each institution of higher
education and any evidence supporting policies requiring scores above 3 in accordance with the
requirements of this section, and report its findings, evidence supporting policies requiring scores
above 3 and any recommendations with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives,
and the chairs of the joint committee on higher education not later than July 1. Each institution of
higher education shall provide the board of higher education, and in the case of the University of
Massachusetts, its board of trustees, with all necessary data, in accordance with the federal
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, to conduct the analysis.
SECTION 2. The first annual report required by subsection (c) of section 39A of chapter
15A of the General Laws shall be published not later than July 1, 2026.
of 3

SECTION 3. The department shall determine when section 1 shall take effect, but it shall
be no later than one year after enactment.
of 3